Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 3 Eligibility for Appointment as Senior Judge

47-8-40.
Eligibility for appointment to the office of senior judge; salary; creditable service.

Any judge of a superior court of this state who is in at least his nineteenth year of service as judge of a superior court or who had been in service as a superior court judge for 19 years as of March 9, 1945, and who is still in such service shall be eligible for appointment as a senior judge under this chapter, provided that he has made payments under Code Section 47-8-43 for at least 19 years. Service as district attorney of a judicial circuit; as judge of or solicitor of a city court, county court, or any court of record of the state from which an appeal may be taken directly to the Court of Appeals of Georgia; membership in the General Assembly; or service in the armed forces of the United States occasioned by the national emergencies of World War I, World War II, or the Korean Conflict shall be allowable in computing the required 19 years of service, provided that at least four years have been served as judge of a superior court. Credit for service in the General Assembly shall be for the entire term of office to which such person was elected and served.

Any judge of a superior court who has reached 68 years of age and who is in at least his tenth year of service as a judge of a superior court shall be eligible for appointment as a senior judge.

Any judge of a superior court who has been in service as a judge of a superior court for ten years and who becomes disabled and is unable to continue his duties as judge of the superior court shall be eligible for appointment as senior judge upon presentation of satisfactory evidence of such disability to the board of trustees and a recommendation of appointment by a majority of the board of trustees.

Any judge of a superior court who has reached age 65 and has completed ten years of actual service as judge of a superior court, as distinguished from creditable service, shall be eligible for appointment to senior judge and for early retirement at one-half of the salary paid to superior court judges, provided that he has made the payments required under Code Section 47-8-43.

Any former judge of a superior court who has reached the age of 75, who has served 16 years as judge of a superior court, who reached the age of 68 while serving such 16 years as judge of the superior court, and who has also served four years in the General Assembly prior to his service as judge of the superior court shall be eligible for appointment by the Governor to the office of senior judge. Such person shall be required by the board of trustees to pay into the retirement fund a sum equal to 5 percent of the salary received by such judge from March 9, 1945, to the time he reached 68 years of age. Such person, when so appointed by the Governor, shall receive a salary equivalent to one-half of the salary then being paid to the judge of the superior court of the circuit in which he served and his actual expense incurred while holding court in a county other than that of his residence, provided that the sum to be received shall not exceed $4,000.00 per annum.

Any other provision of this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, any judge of a superior court of any circuit who, during a term of office to which he was elected, resigned for the purpose of entering the armed forces of the United States during World War II, who did enter the armed forces, and who thereafter resumed duties as a judge of a superior court of his judicial circuit during the term of office to which he had been elected shall, for all purposes, be considered to have been continuously in service as judge of the superior court during that whole term of office. The whole of that term of office shall be considered in computing his period of service for all purposes under this chapter.

Military service time in the armed forces of the United States during time of war shall be computed in addition to all other service under the terms of this chapter.

In granting credit for service in the armed forces of the United States, one year of credit shall be granted for each year or fraction of a year of such service.

From and after March 13, 1957, any service as an assistant district attorney of a judicial circuit, which office is provided for by law, or as a district attorney pro tempore pursuant to Code Section 15-18-5 shall be allowable in computing years of service as a judge of the superior court under this Code section, provided that sums due under this chapter for such service have been paid.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 362, § 2; Ga. L. 1946, p. 228, § 1; Ga. L. 1950, p. 283, §§ 1, 5; Ga. L. 1950, p. 341, § 1; Ga. L. 1952, p. 293, § 1; Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 108, § 1; Ga. L. 1955, p. 152, § 1; Ga. L. 1956, p. 380, § 1; Ga. L. 1957, p. 82, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1957, p. 486, § 1; Ga. L. 1960, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 1961, p. 64, § 1; Ga. L. 1961, p. 429, § 1; Ga. L. 1965, p. 102, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 275, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 586, § 32; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47; Ga. L. 2000, p. 131, § 1.

47-8-41.
Eligibility for appointment as a senior judge or retirement; salary or benefits; creditable service.

Any judge of a superior court of this state who is in at least his nineteenth year of service as a judge of a superior court of this state, any service as district attorney of a judicial circuit, as a judge of or solicitor of a city or county court of this state, or membership in the General Assembly or service in the armed forces of the United States occasioned by the national emergencies of World War I, World War II, or the Korean Conflict, or assistant district attorney or district attorney pro tempore as herein provided, being allowable in computing such 19 years’ service, provided at least one complete term or its equivalent number of years in two or more terms have been served as judge of a superior court of this state or who has already been in service for 19 years as a judge of a superior court of this state on March 9, 1945, and who is still in service as such officer, shall be eligible for appointment at his pleasure and shall be eligible to receive the benefits now or hereafter offered judges of the superior courts, provided that the General Assembly retirement service credit shall be for the entire term of office to which such person was elected and served.

Any judge of a superior court of this state qualifying under any one of the following provisions shall be eligible to retire at his pleasure and shall be eligible to receive one-half of the salary now or hereafter paid to judges of the superior courts by the state:

He has reached the age of 65 years and has completed ten years of service as a judge of the superior courts of this state, as distinguished from creditable service, and has for the period of his service as such judge made payments to the fund at the rate herein specified, and has been appointed under this chapter as a senior judge of the superior courts, as provided in Code Section 47-8-40; or

Any judge of a superior court of this state who has been in service as a judge of the superior court for at least ten years and who becomes disabled from continuing his duties as judge of the superior court and who shall have attained the age of 62 years, satisfactory evidence of such disability having been presented to the board of trustees and a recommendation of appointment having been made by a majority of the board.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 362, § 11; Ga. L. 1946, p. 228, § 2; Ga. L. 1950, p. 283, § 3; Ga. L. 1952, p. 293, § 3; Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 108, § 3; Ga. L. 1955, p. 152, § 3; Ga. L. 1956, p. 380, § 3; Ga. L. 1960, p. 161, §§ 3, 3A; Ga. L. 1976, p. 586, § 35; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47; Ga. L. 1993, p. 86, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 64/SB 436.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “district attorney pro tempore” for “district attorney pro tem.” in the middle of subsection (a).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 127, § 67, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “In the event of an irreconcilable conflict between a provision of Sections 62 through 64 of this Act and a provision of another Act enacted at the 2010 regular session of the General Assembly, the provision of such other Act shall control over this Act to the extent of the conflict.”

47-8-42.
Eligibility for retirement; benefits.

No judge shall be eligible for benefits under this chapter unless he has qualified under one of the following provisions:

Retirement at two-thirds’ the salary paid to superior court judges:

Any judge of a superior court of this state who is in at least his nineteenth year of service as a judge of the superior court computed as provided in this chapter; or

Any judge of a superior court already in service for 19 years on March 9, 1945, as a judge of a superior court and who is still in service as such officer.

Retirement at one-half of the salary paid to superior court judges:

Any judge of a superior court of this state who has attained the age of 65 years and who has completed ten years of actual service as a judge of a superior court; or

Any judge of a superior court who has been in service as a judge of a superior court for at least ten years and who becomes disabled from continuing his duties as judge of the superior court, who shall have attained the age of 62 years, satisfactory evidence of such disability having been presented to the board of trustees and a recommendation of appointment having been made by a majority of the board.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 362, § 12; Ga. L. 1946, p. 228, § 3; Ga. L. 1950, p. 283, § 4; Ga. L. 1952, p. 293, § 4; Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 108, § 4; Ga. L. 1955, p. 152, § 4; Ga. L. 1976, p. 586, § 36; Ga. L. 1992, p. 477, § 1.

47-8-43.
Payments by superior court judges to the fund.

Any judge of a superior court shall be permitted to pay into the fund the amount of 5 percent of the salary paid to such judge by the state and any such judge who makes payment into this fund shall be eligible to retire from office as a senior judge at a salary of two-thirds of the salary now or hereafter paid to judges of the superior courts by the State of Georgia, provided he meets the following conditions:

He is in at least his nineteenth year of service as a judge of the superior courts of this state or has already been in service for 19 years as a judge of the superior courts of this state on March 9, 1945, and has been appointed as a senior judge as provided in Code Section 47-8-40;

He has for a period of 19 years made payments to the fund at the rate specified in this Code section. However, all judges who are over 50 years of age shall be eligible to retire when they have attained the age of 68 years at two-thirds’ the salary paid by the state to such judges, provided such judges have served for at least 19 years and have made payments to the fund at the rate therein specified until they reached the age of 68 years, such payments to commence from March 9, 1945, provided that any judge who shall, by virtue of the amendment of this chapter approved February 16, 1950, be made eligible for appointment as a senior judge and who shall not have made payments to the Superior Court Judges Retirement Fund of Georgia at the time of the passage of such amendment shall be required to pay into the fund the amount fixed by this chapter for each of the years that such judge has served as a superior court judge from January 1, 1951, up to and including the year that such judge may be appointed as a senior judge, provided such judge has served at least four years in one complete term or its equivalent number of years in two or more terms as judge of the superior courts. Any superior court judge, in order to qualify under this Code section, who has previously served as district attorney shall have contributed to the District Attorneys Retirement Fund from the date of the enactment of the District Attorneys Retirement Fund or from the time such judge became a district attorney, whichever is the later date. In the event that a judge shall receive credit under this subsection for service as a district attorney, the board of trustees of the District Attorneys Retirement Fund is authorized and directed to transfer the amounts which such judge has contributed to such fund to the Superior Court Judges Retirement Fund of Georgia; and

Any other provisions notwithstanding, any judge of the superior courts who had not made payments to the Superior Court Judges Retirement Fund of Georgia at the time of the passage of the amendment of this chapter, approved February 16, 1950, and who is in his nineteenth year of service as a judge of the superior courts, district attorney, or judge or solicitor of a state, county, or city court or any court of record of the State of Georgia from which an appeal may be taken directly to the Court of Appeals of Georgia, shall make payments as provided by law to the Superior Court Judges Retirement Fund of Georgia from January 1, 1951, to the date of appointment as a senior judge under this chapter, provided that nothing in this subsection shall be construed so as to authorize the refund of any amounts previously paid into the Superior Court Judges Retirement Fund of Georgia.

All judges of the superior courts shall be permitted to pay into the fund the amount of 5 percent of the salary paid to such judges by the State of Georgia and any of such judges who have made payment to this fund shall be eligible to retire from office as senior judge at a salary of one-half of the salary now or hereafter paid to judges of the superior court by the State of Georgia, provided he meets either of the following conditions:

He has reached the age of 65 years and has completed ten years of service as a judge of the superior courts of this state, as distinguished from creditable service, and has for the period of his service as such judge made payments to the fund at the rate specified in this subsection and has been appointed as a senior judge of the superior courts, as provided in Code Section 47-8-40; or

He has for a period of ten years made payment to such fund at the rate specified in this subsection and is prevented because of incapacity from continuing his duties as judge of the superior courts and has been appointed as a senior judge, as provided in Code Section 47-8-40, provided that any amount accruing prior to December 11, 1953, may be paid at such times as the board of trustees of the Superior Court Judges Retirement Fund of Georgia may direct.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 283, § 2; Ga. L. 1952, p. 293, § 2; Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 108, § 2; Ga. L. 1955, p. 152, § 2; Ga. L. 1960, p. 161, §§ 4, 4A; Ga. L. 1961, p. 429, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1976, p. 586, § 34; Ga. L. 1987, p. 146, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 86, § 1.

47-8-44.
Payment of contributions on behalf of superior court judges.

On and after July 1, 1980, the employer shall pay to the fund on each and every payroll period employee contributions on behalf and to the credit of such judges of the superior court in an amount equal to the amount which would be paid to the annuity savings fund pursuant to Code Section 47-2-54 if the judge of the superior court were a member of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia. Such judges of the superior courts shall continue to have deducted from their state salaries the additional amount of employee contributions required by this chapter.

The monthly employee contributions made by the employer on behalf of a judge of the superior courts as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section shall be used in the computation of the judge’s state salary for the computation of retirement benefits.

With respect to any senior judges who have retired or who will retire in the future, the employee contributions paid by the employer on behalf of an active judge of the superior court as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section shall be included in current salary and used for the purpose of computing the monthly retirement benefits provided by this chapter. The monthly retirement benefit of each heretofore retired senior judge shall be increased accordingly, effective July 1, 1980.

All members shall retain, have, and be subject to all other rights, privileges, obligations, and duties provided for by other provisions of this chapter; and all such other provisions shall remain of full force and effect with respect to any matter not specifically provided for in this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 925, § 12.

47-8-45.
Credit for service rendered during the year in which a superior court judge would become eligible for retirement and appointment as a senior judge.

In computing the number of years of service, wherever necessary to become eligible for appointment and retirement under this chapter, the entire year in which a superior court judge would become eligible shall be computed as a part of the required number of years of service, although actually he served for only a part of that year.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 108, § 5.